Utah statutes.
17C-1-206.   Use of eminent domain prohibited -- Exception.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), an agency may not use eminent domain to acquire property.

(2)  An agency may use eminent domain to acquire:

(a)  any interest in property within an urban renewal project area, subject to Chapter 2, Part 6, Eminent Domain in an Urban Renewal Project Area; and

(b)  any interest in property that is owned by an agency board member or officer and located within a project area, if the board member or officer consents.



Amended by Chapter 379, 2007 General Session

